Hawaii statutes.
§386-6 Territorial applicability. (a)
This chapter shall be applicable to all work injuries sustained by employees
within the territorial boundaries of the State.

(b) If an employee who has been hired in the
State suffers work injury, the employee shall be entitled to compensation under
this chapter even though the injury was sustained without the State. The right
to compensation shall exclude all other liability of the employer for damages
as provided in section 386-5. All contracts of hire of employees made within
the State shall be deemed to include an agreement to that effect.

(c) If an employee who has been hired without
the State is injured while engaged in the business of the employee's employer,
and is entitled to compensation for the injury under the law of the state or
territory where the employee was hired, the employee shall be entitled to
enforce against the employee's employer the employee's rights in this State if
the employee's rights are such that they can reasonably be determined and dealt
with by the director of labor and industrial relations, the appellate board,
and the court in this State. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-6; HRS §386-6;
am L 2016, c 55, §10]

Case Notes

Not exclusive remedy where emotional distress is caused by
wilful and wanton conduct of corporate officer. 720 F. Supp. 829 (1989).

Claimant not entitled to rely on foreign law where in
proceedings below, claimant not only failed to rely on foreign law but
affirmatively relied on Hawaii law. 54 H. 98, 503 P.2d 434 (1972).

Employee "hired in the State" construed. 59 H.
551, 584 P.2d 119 (1978).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next